Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; URBAN LEAGUE TWIN CITIES.new text end new text begin $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $400,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Urban League Twin Cities for support and expansion of its workforce solutions and wealth building programs. These are onetime appropriations. new text end